Utah statutes.
49-20-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Covered employer" means an employer that offers employee benefit plans under this chapter to its employees and their dependents.

(2)  "Covered individual" means an employee and the employee's dependents eligible for coverage under this chapter.

(3)  "Employee Benefit Plans" means any group health, dental, medical, disability, life insurance, medicare supplement, conversion coverage, cafeteria, flex plans, or other program for covered individuals administered by the Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program.

(4)  "Employer" means the state, its political subdivisions, and educational institutions.

(5)  "Program" means the Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program.

